05_Project/verbs.lexc
! The main morphological differences between LF and SF
! are in verbs and personal pronouns
! e.g. the use of "ils" in the plural regardless of gender
! But I'm focusing on nouns for now because that's easier to start with

Multichar_Symbols

%<verb%>		! Verb

%<sg%>			! singular
%<pl%>			! plural

%<m%>			! masculine
%<f%>			! feminine

%<c1%>			! first conjugation (-er)
%<c2%>			! first conjugation (-ir)
%<c3%>			! first conjugation (-re)
%<c4%>			! first conjugation (-oir)

%<inf%>			! infinitive
%<part%>		! participle

%<indic%>		! indicative
%<cond%>		! conditional
%<subj%>		! subjunctive
%<imper%>		! imperative

%<past%>		! past
%<pres%>		! present
%<fut%>			! future
%<imperf%>		! imperfect
%<perf%>		! perfect

%>				! morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Verbs;

! Generate masculine & feminine form of adjectives
LEXICON Adj
%<m%>: Number;
%<f%>: %>e Number;

LEXICON AdjMF
%<m%>: Number;
%<f%>: Number;
! Generate singular & plural forms
! of adjectives, nouns, etc.
LEXICON Number
%<sg%>: #;
%<pl%>: %>s #;

! This is the only productive verb class in LF
LEXICON V-er
%<c1%>%<inf%>: %>er #;							! infinitive
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<part%>: %>ant #;				! present participle
%<c1%>%<past%>%<part%>: %>é Adj;				! past participle

%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-SG;		! present indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: V-ImperfIndic;		! imperfect indicative
%<c1%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: %>er V-FutIndic;		! future indicative simple

%<c1%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: %>er V-ImperfIndic;		! imperfect indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: V-PresSubj;				! present subjunctive
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: %>ass V-ImperfSubj;	! imperfect subjunctive
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ât #;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<c1%>%<imper%>: V-Imperative-er;				! imperative

LEXICON V-ir
%<c2%>%<inf%>: %>ir #;							! infinitive
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<part%>: %>ant #;				! present participle
%<c2%>%<past%>%<part%>: %>i Adj;				! past participle

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-SG;		! present indicative
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: %>iss V-PresIndic-PL;	! present indicative
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: %>iss V-ImperfIndic;	! imperfect indicative
%<c2%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: %>ir V-FutIndic;		! future indicative simple

%<c2%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: %>ir V-ImperfIndic;		! present conditional
%<c2%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: %>iss V-PresSubj;		! present subjunctive
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: %>iss V-ImperfSubj;	! imperfect subjunctive
%<c2%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ît #;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<c2%>%<imper%>: V-Imperative-ir;				! imperative fix this

LEXICON V-re
%<c3%>%<inf%>: %>re #;								! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: %>ant #;					! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: %>u Adj;					! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-SG-re;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-PL;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: V-ImperfIndic-re;		! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: %>r V-FutIndic;				! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: %>r V-ImperfIndic-re;		! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: %>iss V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: %>iss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ît #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>: V-Imperative-re;					! imperative fix this

LEXICON V-Invar
%<invar%>%<inf%>: #;						! infinitive
%<invar%>%<pres%>%<part%>: #;				! present participle
%<invar%>%<past%>%<part%>: #;				! past participle

%<invar%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-InvEndings;	! present indicative
%<invar%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: V-InvEndings;	! imperfect indicative
%<invar%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: V-InvEndings;	! future indicative simple

%<invar%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: V-InvEndings;	! imperfect indicative
%<invar%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: V-InvEndings;	! present subjunctive
%<invar%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: V-InvEndings;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<invar%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: #;			! imperative
%<invar%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: #;

LEXICON V-InvEndings
%<1p%>%<sg%>: #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: #;

LEXICON V-PresIndic-SG
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>es #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>e #;

LEXICON V-PresIndic-SG-re
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>s #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>s #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>t #;

LEXICON V-PresIndic-PL
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>ez #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>ent #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>ont #;	! This form is sometimes attested in CF

LEXICON V-ImperfIndic
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>ais #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>ais #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ait #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>iez #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>ient #;

LEXICON V-ImperfIndic-re
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>ais #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>ais #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ait #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>iez #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>aient #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>iont #;		! This form is sometimes attested in CF

LEXICON V-FutIndic
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>ai #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>as #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>a #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>ez #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>ont #;

LEXICON V-PresSubj
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>es #;
%<3p%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>iez #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>ent #;

! Same as pres subj except for 3sg
LEXICON V-ImperfSubj
%<1p%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>es #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>iez #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>ent #;
%<3p%>%<pl%>: %>ont #;	! This form is sometimes attested in CF

LEXICON V-Imperative-er
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>e #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>ez #;

LEXICON V-Imperative-ir
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>is #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>issez #;

LEXICON V-Imperative-re
%<2p%>%<sg%>: %>s #;
%<2p%>%<pl%>: %>ez #;

! These are the only attested forms per Conwell and Juilland (162)
LEXICON V-aller
%<c1%>%<inf%>: all%>er #;								! infinitive
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<part%>: all%>ant #;						! present participle
%<c1%>%<past%>%<part%>: all%>é Adj;						! past participle
%<c1%>%<past%>%<part%>: été Adj;						! past participle

%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: vais #;			! present indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: vas #;				! present indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: va #;				! present indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<pl%>: all%>ons #;		! present indicative (nous)
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: all%>ez #;			! present indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: vont #;			! present indicative

%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: all%>ais #;		! imperfect indicative
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: all%>ait #;		! imperfect indicative
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: all%>aient #;	! imperfect indicative

%<c1%>%<fut%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: iras #;				! future indicative simple
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: aille #;			! present subjunctive

%<c1%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: vas #;						! imperative
%<c1%>%<imper%>%<1p%>%<pl%>: all%>ons #;				! imperative
%<c1%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: vas #;						! imperative

LEXICON V-appeler
%<c1%>%<inf%>: appel%>er #;								! infinitive
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<part%>: appel%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c1%>%<past%>%<part%>: appel%>é Adj;					! past participle

%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: appell V-PresIndic-SG;			! present indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: appel%>ez #;		! present subjunctive
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: appell%>ent #;		! present subjunctive

%<c1%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: V-PresIndic-PL;				! present indicative
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: appel V-ImperfIndic-re;		! imperfect indicative
%<c1%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: appell%>er V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c1%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: appell%>er V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: appell V-PresIndic-SG;			! present subjunctive
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: appel%>iez #;		! present subjunctive
%<c1%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: appell%>ent #;		! present subjunctive

%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: appel%>ass V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c1%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: appel%>ât #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c1%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: appell%>e #;				! imperative
%<c1%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: appel%>ez #;				! imperative

LEXICON Verbs
aider%<verb%>: aid V-er;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE/PRON. intr = "to help", pron = "to help oneself or each other"
aimer%<verb%>: aim V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON. "to love, like" pron = "to love oneself or each other"
aller%<verb%>:  V-aller;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE/PRON/AUX intr = "to go, be"; pron s'en aller = "to leave"; aux = "to be going to"
amener%<verb%>: amen V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON trans = "to bring"; pron = "to bring along (for oneself)"
appeler%<verb%>: V-appeler;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON trans = "to call", intr = "to call out", pron = "to be called"
arrêter%<verb%>: arrêt V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to stop"
arriver%<verb%>: arriv V-er;		! VERB INTRANSITIVE "to arrive, happen, succeed"
attendre%<verb%>: attend V-re;		! VERB "to hear"
bouillir%<verb%>: bouill V-ir;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to boil"
chanter%<verb%>: chant V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to sing"
chercher%<verb%>: cherch V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to search for; to search; to look for each other"
commencer%<verb%>: commenc V-er;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to begin"
comprendre%<verb%>: comprend V-re;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to understand"
coucher%<verb%>: couch V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON trans = "to put to bed; flatten" intr = "to sleep"; pron = "go to bed; sleep"
courser%<verb%>: cours V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to chase, to race"
danser%<verb%>: dans V-er;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE "to dance"
décider%<verb%>: décid V-er;		! VERB "to decide"
déménager%<verb%>: déménag V-er;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to move"
doucer%<verb%>: douc V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE "to sweeten"
écrire%<verb%>: écri V-re;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to write"
élever%<verb%>: élev V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to raise; grow; rise"
entrer%<verb%>: entr V-er;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE "to go in"
étouffer%<verb%>: étouff V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to suffocate"
finir%<verb%>: fin V-ir;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to finish"
forcer%<verb%>: forc V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to force"
gone%<verb%>: gone V-Invar;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE INVARIABLE "to leave"
graisser%<verb%>: graiss V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to grease"
gris-gris%<verb%>: gris-gris V-Invar;	! VERB TRANSITIVE INVARIABLE "to cast a spell on"
jouer%<verb%>: jou V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to play"
laver%<verb%>: lav V-er;			! VERB
lever%<verb%>: lev V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to raise"
manger%<verb%>: mang V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to eat, erode" PHONOLOGY CHECK
marier%<verb%>: mari V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to marry, to join; to get married"
mousser%<verb%>: mouss V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE "to hurry"
passer%<verb%>: pass V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE "to pass"
perdre%<verb%>: perd V-re;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to lose"
plancher%<verb%>: planch V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE "to floor" also planchonner
pointer%<verb%>: point V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to point"
pourrir%<verb%>: pourr V-ir;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to cause to rot; to rot"
quitter%<verb%>: quitt V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to allow"
rappeller%<verb%>: rappell V-er;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to remember; to call back; to remember"
rejoindre%<verb%>: rejoind V-re;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to meet up with; to meet each other"
rencontrer%<verb%>: rencontr V-er;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to meet"
rester%<verb%>: rest V-er;			! VERB INTRANSITIVE "to remain"
soigner%<verb%>: soign V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to take care of"
tirer%<verb%>: tir V-er;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to pull, shoot; to serve; to jump"
travailler%<verb%>: travaill V-er;	! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to work"
tuer%<verb%>: tu V-er;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to kill"
vendre%<verb%>: vend V-re;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to sell; to be sold"
visiter%<verb%>: visit V-er;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to visit"
back%<verb%>: back V-Invar;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to back" invariable
